Idaho, session 2025, H0131.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 37, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-3704, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-3704. DISCLOSURE OF MRNA VACCINATIONS FOR BLOOD DONATIONS -- LA-
BELING -- RIGHT TO REQUEST CERTAIN BLOOD. (1) Any person who collects human
blood donations for the purpose of providing blood for human blood transfu-
sions shall require blood donors to disclose whether the blood donor has re-
ceived a COVID-19 vaccine or a messenger ribonucleic acid vaccine during the
donor's lifetime.
(2) Blood originating from a donor who has received a COVID-19 vaccine
or a messenger ribonucleic acid vaccine shall be clearly and conspicuously
marked.
(3) In a nonemergency situation, as determined by the person provid-
ing medical services, a person receiving a blood transfusion shall have the
right to request blood based on whether or not the blood originated from a
person who has received a COVID-19 vaccine or a messenger ribonucleic acid
vaccine, as long as the requested blood is available.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.